Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 5
DISCONNECTION BY ORDINANCE - STATUTORY CITIES AND TOWNS

31-12-501. Application - enactment - filing - definitions.

When the owner of a tract of land within and adjacent to the boundary of a municipality desires to have said tract disconnected from such municipality, such owner may apply to the governing body of such municipality for the enactment of an ordinance disconnecting such tract of land from such municipality. The owner shall also provide notice and a copy of the application to the board of county commissioners of the county in which the tract of land that is the subject of the application is located and to the board of directors of any affected special district. No later than the effective date of the disconnection of a particular tract of land, any vested property rights affecting the tract that have been established pursuant to article 68 of title 24 prior to such date that are possessed by the owner of the tract shall be expired or relinquished.

Not more than thirty days after receiving the notice required by subsection (1) of this section, either the board of county commissioners or the board of directors of any affected special district may request a meeting with the owner and the governing body of the municipality, or its appointee, to discuss and address any negative impacts on the county that would result from the disconnection. If such meeting is requested, the owner and the governing body or its appointee shall meet with either the board of county commissioners, or its appointee, or the board of any affected special district, or its appointee, not more than thirty days after the meeting was requested. Failure by either the board of county commissioners or the board of any affected special district to request a meeting constitutes an acknowledgment by the particular board that the disconnection will not adversely affect the county or an affected special district, as applicable.

As used in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), "affected special district" means any special district that by its service plan or pursuant to an intergovernmental agreement is or will be expected to provide service to the tract of land that is the subject of the disconnection application. For purposes of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), "negative impact" includes any change in the level or extent of services being provided to the tract of land by any special district.

On receipt of such application, the governing body of the municipality shall give due consideration to the disconnection application, and, if such governing body is of the opinion that the best interests of the municipality will not be prejudiced by the disconnection of such tract, it shall enact an ordinance effecting such disconnection.

If such an ordinance is enacted, it is immediately effective upon the required filing with the county clerk and recorder to accomplish the disconnection, and two certified copies thereof shall be filed by the clerk in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county in which such tract lies. The county clerk and recorder shall file the second certified copy with the division of local government in the department of local affairs, as provided by section 24-32-109, C.R.S.

Any tract of land that has been disconnected from a municipality, whether by means of an ordinance enacted under subsection (3) of this section or a court decree that has been entered under part 6 of this article 12, shall be made subject to the applicable county's zoning resolution and map and other land development regulations within ninety days after the effective date of the disconnection as described in subsection (4) of this section. Any provision of the county's zoning resolution, zoning map, or zoning plan automatically applying a uniform zoning classification to all land that may be disconnected in the future is void and of no effect as to any particular tract of land. The county may institute the procedure specified in the Colorado Revised Statutes, in its zoning resolution or zoning plan, or in its other land development regulations to allow the particular tract of land to obtain the necessary land entitlements at any time after the county receives the notice from the municipality regarding enactment of an ordinance disconnecting the tract from the municipality described in subsection (1) of this section; except that any such zoning resolution, zoning plan, or other land development action shall not be enacted and made effective until the tract of land has been disconnected from the municipality in accordance with this section.

During the ninety-day period specified in subsection (5)(a) of this section, or such lesser time as is required to satisfy such requirement, the county may elect not to issue any building or occupancy permit for all or any portion of the land area that is the subject of the disconnection application.

Any county may commence the procedure specified in its own subdivision regulations to subdivide the tract of land that is the subject of the disconnection application at any time after the disconnection has been completed and the ordinance has been filed with the county clerk and recorder in accordance with subsection (4) of this section; except that the county shall not make a final decision approving the subdivision until zoning affecting the particular tract of land has been enacted in accordance with subsection (5)(a) of this section.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1100, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

Entire part amended, (HB 16-1272), ch. 82, p. 209, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2020:

(1) amended and (5) added, (HB 20-1133), ch. 99, p. 384, § 1, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-601 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-502. Liability for taxes.

The land so disconnected shall not thereby be exempt from the payment of any taxes lawfully assessed against it for the purpose of paying any indebtedness lawfully contracted by the governing body of such municipality while such land was within the limits thereof and which remains unpaid and for the payment of which said land could be lawfully taxed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1101, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

Entire part amended, (HB 16-1272), ch. 82, p. 210, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-602 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-503. Future levies - prepayment.

When the governing body of such municipality levies a tax upon the property within such municipality for the purpose of paying such indebtedness or any part thereof or interest thereon, such governing body may levy a tax at the same rate and for the same purpose on the land so disconnected. The county treasurer shall pay over to such municipality all moneys collected by the treasurer on account of such tax, to be applied only to the payment of such indebtedness. In case the owner of any land so disconnected pays off and discharges a portion of such indebtedness equal in amount to the same proportion of the indebtedness which the valuation for assessment of the land bears to the entire valuation for assessment of all the property subject to taxation for the payment of such indebtedness, calculated according to the last assessment previous to such payment, said land is exempted from further taxation to pay such indebtedness. Upon such payment being made, the canceled bonds or other evidences of payment of such portion of said indebtedness must be deposited with the treasurer of such municipality, and a certificate shall be given by the treasurer stating that such payment has been made.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1101, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

Entire part amended, (HB 16-1272), ch. 82, p. 210, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-603 as it existed prior to 1975.